Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-5603.02
Licensed reinsurance intermediary; consent to jurisdiction.

A reinsurance intermediary, by accepting licensure in this state, is deemed to have consented to the jurisdiction of the director and of the courts of this state with respect to all activities conducted under the license and to have designated the director as its agent for service of process. Each licensed reinsurance intermediary shall furnish the director with the name and address of a designated contact resident of this state to whom notices or orders of the director or process affecting the reinsurance intermediary may be forwarded. The licensee shall promptly notify the director in writing of every change in its designated contact for service of process, and such changes shall not become effective until acknowledged by the director.

Laws 2002, LB 1139, § 41.